app/utils/MuseScoreWindows/tables/sw-ke-g1-4.ctb
# liblouis: Swahili (Kenya) Grade 1.4
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#
#-index-name: Swahili, contracted, grade 1.4
#-display-name: Swahili grade 1.4 contracted braille
#
#-author: Jake Kyle
#-author: Dipendra Manocha
#-author: Martin Kieti
#-maintainer: Jake Kyle <jake@compassbraille.org>
#-updated: 2022
#
#+language:sw
#+region:sw-KE
#+type:literary
#+grade:1.4
#+contraction: partial
#
#-copyright: 2022, Compass Braille <http://www.compassbraille.org>
#-copyright: 2022, the DAISY Consortium <https://daisy.org/>
#-license: LGPLv2.1
#
# Copyright (C) 2022 by Compass Braille <http://www.compassbraille.org>
# Copyright (C) 2022 by the DAISY Consortium <https://daisy.org/>
#
# With contributions from DAISY Consortium under project supported by Microsoft.
#
# This table was created using information contained in a document entitled
# "Kenya Swahili Braille Code" (see <http://liblouis.org/braille-specs/swahili/>)
# which was derived from the Kenya Institute of Curriculum Development's Swahili
# Braille Manual: “Mwongozo wa Breli Ya Kiswahili”.
#
# The Braille code is graded into 6 grades: 1, 1.2, 1.3, 1.4, 1.5 and 2. This is
# in line with the Kenya Institute of Curriculum Development’s Curriculum
# Designs for Kiswahili Braille. 
#
# The Braille code in the document was adopted at a Stakeholders Workshop held
# at the Swiss Lenana Mount Hotel on 25th August 2022.
#

include sw-ke-g1-3.ctb


# Contractions Using Dot 5 Followed by a Single Letter or Single Cell Contraction 
# When dot 5 is followed by a single letter, the two create a contraction as follows:

always bibi 5-12 5b
always changa 5-14 5c
always dini 5-145 5d
always embe 5-15 5e
always fungu 5-124 5f
always ganda 5-1245 5g
always hapa 5-125 5h
always jiji 5-245 5j
always kata 5-13 5k
always lala 5-123 5l
always mimi 5-134 5m
always nyinyi 5-1345 5n
always ona 5-135 5o
always pamba 5-1234 5p
always rudi 5-1235 5r
always sisi 5-234 5s
always taka 5-2345 5t
always unda 5-136 5u
always vita 5-1236 5v
always wazi 5-2456 5w
always yawe 5-13456 5y
always zuri 5-1356 5z
always changamoto 5-16 5ch
always sheria 5-146 5sh
always theluji 5-1456 5th
always mwalimu 5-123456 5mw
always dhati 5-2346 5dh
always swahili 5-12356 5sw


# Contractions Using Dots 456 Followed by a Single Letter or Single Cell Contraction
# The contractions are created using dots 456 imediately preceeding the first letter
# of the word. They can be used anywhere in the word. 

always baba 456-12 456b
always dada 456-145 456d
always jibu 456-245 456j
always kaka 456-13 456k
always mama 456-134 456m
always nyanya 456-1345 456n
always sema 456-234 456s
always wewe 456-2456 456w - not supplied in document but in Duxbury
always yeye 456-13456 456y
always shangazi 456-146 456sh

# -- end of table --
